Hawaii statutes.
[§78-3.5] Experimental modernization
projects. (a) It is the intent of this section to encourage and
facilitate improvements in the human resource programs of the several
jurisdictions. With the approval of the chief executive, the director may
conduct experimental modernization projects to determine whether specific
changes in its human resource program would result in a more desirable program
for the jurisdiction.

(b) Prior to the implementation of any
experimental modernization project, the director shall:

(1) Develop a plan identifying the purposes of the
project, the methodology to be used, the duration of the project, the criteria
for evaluation of the project, and the cost of the project, if any;

(2) Consult with the employees who would be involved
in the conduct of the project; and

(3) Negotiate with the exclusive representative if a
modification or waiver of any provision in a collective bargaining agreement is
necessary to conduct the project.

(c) While the project is in progress, it shall
not be limited by state or local personnel laws and rules, but shall be in
compliance with all equal employment opportunity laws and laws prohibiting
discrimination. [L 2000, c 253, pt of §74]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next